District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-1221.03

Funds subject to appropriations.

Repealed.

History

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-256, § 305, 48 DCR 730
Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 7031, 55 DCR 7598

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) additions of sections, see §§ 2 through 16 of the Retail Incentive Temporary Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-58, on December 9, 2003, law notification 51 DCR 1793).